District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-2202.06c

Storm Water Advisory Panel.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-111, § 206c
as added June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-311, § 2(b), 48 DCR 3512
May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 11, 49 DRC 3444
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 52, 52 DCR 2638
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 48(d), 53 DCR 6794
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-371, § 3(b), 56 DCR 1353

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-137, in subsec. (b), substituted “7” for “5”; in subsecs. (b)(4) and (b)(5), made nonsubstantive changes; and added subsecs. (b)(6) and (b)(7).
D.C. Law 15-354, in subsec. (b), inserted “District” preceding “Department of Transportation”.
D.C. Law 16-191 validated a previously made technical change in the directory language of D.C. Law 15-534.